Washington statutes.
RCW 43.115.010

Legislative declaration.

The legislature declares that the public policy of this state is to insure equal opportunity for all of its citizens. The legislature believes that it is the duty of the state to improve the well-being of Hispanics by enabling them to participate fully in all fields of endeavor and assisting them in obtaining governmental services. The legislature further finds that the development of public policy and the delivery of governmental services to meet the special needs of Hispanics can be improved by establishing a focal point in state government for the interests of Hispanics. Therefore the legislature deems it necessary to create a commission to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

[ 1993 c 261 s 1; 1987 c 249 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 34 s 1.]